src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"I-umlaut"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* %^IUML: ; !(Dummy:) [ %> i | %> u r | (%> Cns:*) #: | %> g ] ;
     where Vx in ( a o u ø á ó ú )
	       Vy in ( e y y i æ ø ý )
	   matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ d a:e g ^IUML:0 > i
!!€ dag^IUML>i
!!€ deg00i
!!€ son^IUML>i
!€ s o:y n ^IUML:0 > i
!!€ syn00i
!€ b ó:ø g v:0 ^IUML:0 > i
!!€ bógv^IUML>i
!!€ bøg000i
!€ u:y n g ^IUML:0 r > i
!!€ ung^IUMLr>i
!!€ yng0r0i
!€ f j:0 ø:i r ð ^IUML:0 > i
!!€ fjørð^IUML>i
!!€ f0irð00i



"eI-umlaut"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** for o:e, á:e, i:e
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* %^eIUML: ;
    where Vx in ( o á i )
          Vy in ( e e e )
   matched;

"I-umlaut for bróðir" ! also for other words?
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ó:ø <=> _ Cns:* u: r ( %^EPH: ) %^IUML: ;


"Inverted U-umlaut from ø"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ø:a <=> _ Cns* (Vow: Cns) ( %^EPH: ) %^OEA: ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ f l ø:a t t ^OEA:0 a
!!€ fløtt^OEAa
!!€ flatt0a

"Inverted U-umlaut from o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 o:a <=> _ Cns* (Vow: Cns) ( %^EPH: ) %^OA: ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ f o:a n n ^OA:0 > a r
!!€ fonn^OA>ar
!!€ fann00ar


"o/ei-Umlaut I"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 e:o <=> _ i: Cns:+ %^EIO: ;

"o/ei-Umlaut II"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 i:0 <=> e: _ Cns:+ %^EIO: ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ d r e:o i:0 n g ^EIO:0 > i
!!€ dreing^EIO>i
!!€ dro0ng00i

! XXX Test i dag
!"Suffix-initial vowel deletion for vowel-final stems"
!i:0 <=> _ %> i ;

! merki>ið
! merk00ið


"æ to ø Umlaut for bræv"
æ:ø <=> _ Cns:* %^ØUML: ;



!! ### Vowel deletion rules

"Vowel deletion in front of na"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 a:0 <=> _ %^W: n ;

!"Special Dative v Deletion"
! v:0 <=> g _ ^IUML: >: i ;

!"Plural i Deletion in faðir"
! i:0 <=> :e ð _ r ^IUML: >: ;

! faðir^IUML>ar
! feð0r00ar
!€ f a:e ð i:0 r ^IUML:0 > a r




!! ### Verbal vowel alternation rules

"Stem vowel change in Weak Verbs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^WVV: ; ! WVV = Verb
 	where Vx in (e y)
 		  Vy in (a u)
 		  matched ;

!! **Tests:**
 		  
!€ f l e:a k ^WVV:0 > t
!!€ flek^WVV>t
!!€ flak00t 
!€ v e:a l ^WVV:0 > d i
!!€ vel^WVV>di
!!€ val00di 


"Stem Vowel Shortening in Supine and Participle"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^VSH:  ; !ok, men flúgv > flýg funker fremdeles ikke ...
	where Vx in ( á ó í ú )
	      Vy in ( a o i u )
		  matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ b í:i t ^VSH:0 i n > a
!!€ bít^VSHin>a
!!€ bit00n>a


! Verbal ablaut rules

! Past singular

"Past tense singular diphthongs I"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
0:Vx <=> Cns _ Vy: Cns:+ %^AB1: ;
	where Vx in ( e e e e )
	      Vy in ( í ó u ú )
!	      Vz in ( i y y y )
	matched ;

"Past tense singular diphthongs II"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vy:Vz <=> Cns :Vx _  Cns:+ %^AB1: ;
	where Vx in ( e e e e )
	      Vy in ( í ó u ú )
	      Vz in ( i y y y )
	matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ b 0:e í:i t ^AB1:0
!!€ b0ít^AB1
!!€ beit0


"Past tense singular monophthongs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _  (Cns:+) %^AB3: ;
	where Vx in ( e ø a o á i )
	      Vy in ( a a ó a æ a )
	matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!€ g e:a v ^AB3:0
!!€ gev^AB3
!!€ gav0

"Past tense plural monophthongs"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB2: %> u ;
          _ %^AB2: ;	
        where Vx in ( á í ó ú i e a ø )
    	      Vy in ( ó i u u ó ó i u )
	matched ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to ó"
!Vx:ó <=> _ Cns:+ %> u ;
!	where Vx in ( i e a o á ) ;

"Past tense plural monophthongs to a"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:a <=> _ Cns:+ (%^NGKK:) %^aAB: ;
	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to u"
!Vx:u <=> _ Cns:+ %^uAB: ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

!"Past tense plural monophthongs to o"
!Vx:o <=> _ Cns:+ %^oAB: ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ø ) ;

"Supine u"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:u <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB4: ;
	where Vx in ( i e ø ó ú ) ;

!"Supine u"
!Vx:u <=> Cns+ _ %^AB4: %> ;
!	where Vx in ( i e ) ;

"Supine o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:o <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB5: ;
	where Vx in ( a i e ø ó ú ) ;

!"Supine o"
!Vx:o <=> Cns+ _ %^AB5: %> ;
!	where Vx in ( í ó ú ø i e a ) ;

"Supine i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:i <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB6: ;
	where Vx in ( í a e á ) ;

!"Supine i"
!Vx:i <=> Cns+ _ %^AB6: %> ;
!	where Vx in ( í a e ) ;

"Present tense ý"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
Vx:ý <=> _ Cns:+ %^AB7: ;
	where Vx in ( ó ) ;

!"Adjective neuter after ð"
!t:0 <=> Vow Cns+ Vow ð %^EDH: %> _ #: ;

! brekað>t
! brekað00


!! ### Adjectival Sandhi rule

"Vowel shortening in Neuter"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
ó:o <=> _ ð: %> t ;
!ó:o <= _ :t %> t ; ! check this one.

!! **Tests:**

!€ g ó:o ð:s > t
!!€ góð>t
!!€ got0t
!€ s k j ó t > t
!!€ skjót>t
!!€ skjót0t ??? XXX check



!! ## Other rules

!! ### Morphological passive rules

"u in ur Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 u:0 <=> %> _ r: %^PASS:0 %> s t #: ;

"r Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 r:0 <=> [i:|u:] _ %^PASS:0 %> s t #: ;

"ð Deletion in front of Pass"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 ð:0 <=> _ %^PASS:0 %> s t #: ;


! Remove these when the dust has settled
!"Vowel-deletion in definite article suffix"
! Vx:0 <=> _ (Dummy:) %> (Dummy:) [ i [ n | ð ] | u m | s %> i n s | a | u ] ;
!      where Vx in ( i a ) ;
!"Deleting initial i in definite suffix"
! i:0 <=> %>  Vow                              %> _ [ n u m | n s | n | ð | n i | n a | n n a r ] #: ; 
!             [ a | u | i ] r (Special:*) %>*  %> _ [ n [i|a] r #: ]; 
!               Vow %>+                            _ [ n | ð | n i ] #: ;
!                                                   _ %>+ [ a | u m ] ;
!"Deleting initial i in definite suffix after vowel, ð or g last in stem"
! i:0 <=> Vow %> %>                                _         n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: %>                                   _ %> i:0 n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: %> i:0 %>                           _         n u m #: ;
!         Vow: [ ð | g ] (Special:*) %> ( i:0 ) %> _         n u m #: ; 
!         Vow: [ ð | g ] (Special:*) %>             _ %>  i: n u m #: ;

! Test pairs added from an old file pair-fao.txt, seems obsolete, butt should
! be checked:
!
! aku2r%>a
! ak0r0a
! 
! lyki2l%>a
! lyk0l0a
! 
! afta2n%>a
! aft0n0a
! 
! da3g%>um
! døg0um
! 
! da3g%>i 
! deg0i
! 
! hjall%>s
! hjal00s
! 
! summa2r%>i
! sum00r0i
! 
! hjall%>ar
! hjall0ar
! 
! heyggj%>i
! heygg00i
! 
! hylj2%>ar
! hylj0ar
! 
! dømi%>ið
! dømi00ð
! 
! dømi%>um
! døm00um
